Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF2212.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.2231, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Firefighters and emergency medical personnel. new text begin (a) Except as provided in paragraph (b), new text end whoever new text begin physically new text end assaults any of the following persons deleted text begin and inflicts demonstrable bodily harmdeleted text end is guilty of a deleted text begin felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than two years or to payment of a fine of not more than $4,000, or bothdeleted text end new text begin gross misdemeanornew text end : (1) new text begin either:new text end new text begin (i) new text end a member of a municipal or volunteer fire departmentnew text begin in the performance of the member's duties;new text end or new text begin (ii) a member of an new text end emergency medical services personnel unit in the performance of the member's duties; or (2) a physician, nurse, or other person providing health care services in a hospital emergency department. new text begin (b) Whoever physically assaults a person described in paragraph (a), clause (1) or (2), is guilty of a felony and may be sentenced to imprisonment for not more than three years or to payment of a fine of not more than $6,000, or both, if the assault inflicts demonstrable bodily harm. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 609.50, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Crime. new text begin (a) new text end Whoever intentionally does any of the following may be sentenced as provided in subdivision 2: (1) obstructs, hinders, or prevents the lawful execution of any legal process, civil or criminal, or apprehension of another on a charge or conviction of a criminal offense; (2) obstructs, resists, or interferes with a peace officer while the officer is engaged in the performance of official duties; (3) interferes with or obstructs a firefighter while the firefighter is engaged in the performance of official duties; (4) interferes with or obstructs a member of an ambulance service personnel crew, as defined in section 144E.001, subdivision 3a, who is providing, or attempting to provide, emergency care; or (5) by force or threat of force endeavors to obstruct any employee of the Department of Revenue, Department of Public Safety Driver and Vehicle Services Division, a driver's license agent appointed under section 171.061, or a deputy registrar appointed under section 168.33 while the employee is lawfully engaged in the performance of official duties for the purpose of deterring or interfering with the performance of those duties. new text begin (b) It is a crime punishable as provided in subdivision 2 for someone to approach or remain within 25 feet of a person described in paragraph (a), clause (2), (3), or (4): new text end new text begin (1) while knowing or having reason to know of the person's status and that the person is engaged in the lawful performance of a legal duty; new text end new text begin (2) after having received a verbal warning from the person not to approach; and new text end new text begin (3) with the intent to impede or interfere with the person's ability to perform the legal duty. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective August 1, 2025, and applies to crimes committed on or after that date. new text end